Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.180

Director—Investigations—Publication of violation.

The director, in the director's discretion, may:

(1) Annually, or more frequently, make public or private investigations within or without this state as the director deems necessary to determine whether a registration should be subject to disciplinary action, or whether a person has violated or is about to violate this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms of this chapter;

(2) Publish information concerning a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter; and

(3) Investigate complaints concerning practices by sellers of travel for which registration is required by this chapter.

[ 2002 c 86 s 280; 1994 c 237 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.